el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Εργαλεία και αισθητήρες μετρήσεων > Βαρόμετρα: Ανεροειδή βαρόμετρα; Ψηφιακά βαρόμετρα; Βαρόμετρα υδραργύρου
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Sensores y herramientas de medida > Barómetros: Barómetros aneroide; Barómetros digitales; Barómetros de mercurio
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Måleverktøy og sensorer > Barometere: Aneroid-barometere; Digitale barometere; Kvikksølvbarometere
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Instrumente de măsură și senzori > Barometre: Barometre aneroide; Barometre digitale; Barometre cu mercur
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Måleredskaber og -sensorer > Barometre: Aneroid barometre; Digitale barometre; Kviksølvbarometre
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Ölçüm Aletleri ve Sensörler > Barometreler: Aneroid Barometreler; Dijital Barometreler; Cıva Barometreleri
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 測量工具和感測器 > 氣壓計: 空盒氣壓計; 數位氣壓計; 水銀氣壓計
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Mätverktyg och sensorer > Barometrar: Aneroidbarometrar; Digitala barometrar; Kvicksilverbarometrar
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Outils de mesure et détecteurs > Baromètres: Baromètres anéroïdes; Baromètres numériques; Baromètres à mercure
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Strumenti/sensori misurazione > Barometri: Barometri aneroidi; Barometri digitali; Barometri a mercurio
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Narzędzia pomiarowe i czujniki > Barometry: Barometry aneroidowe; Barometry cyfrowe; Barometry rtęciowe
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Mittarit ja anturit > Ilmapuntarit: Aneroidi-ilmapuntarit; Digitaaliset ilmapuntarit; Elohopeailmapuntarit
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Meracie nástroje a snímače > Barometre: Aneroidné barometre; Digitálne barometre; Ortuťové barometre
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Công cụ đo lường & Cảm biến > Khí áp kế: Khí áp kế bằng sắt; Khí áp kế kỹ thuật số; Khí áp kế thủy ngân
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Meethulpmiddelen en sensoren > Barometers: Aneroïde barometers; Digitale barometers; Kwikbarometers
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Mjerni alati i senzori > Barometri: Aneroidni barometri; Digitalni barometri; Barometri sa živom
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Mérőeszközök és érzékelők > Barométerek: Aneroid barométerek; Digitális barométerek; Higanyos barométerek
en: Hardware > Tools > Measuring Tools & Sensors > Barometers: Aneroid Barometers; Digital Barometers; Mercury Barometers
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Merilna orodja in senzorji > Barometri: Aneroidni barometri; Digitalni barometri; Živosrebrni barometri
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Měřicí nástroje a přístroje > Barometry: Aneroidní barometry; Digitální barometry; Rtuťové barometry
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Matavimo įrankiai ir jutikliai > Barometrai: Aneroidiniai barometrai; Skaitmeniniai barometrai; Gyvsidabrio barometrai
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Messwerkzeuge & Messwertgeber > Barometer: Dosenbarometer; Digitale Barometer; Quecksilberbarometer
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Измерительные инструменты и датчики > Барометры: Анероиды; Цифровые барометры; Ртутные барометры
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > 測定機器・センサー > 気圧計: アネロイド気圧計; デジタル気圧計; 水銀気圧計
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Измервателни инструменти и сензори > Барометри: Анероидни барометри; Цифрови барометри; Живачни барометри
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมือและเซนเซอร์การวัด > บารอมิเตอร์: แอนิรอยด์บารอมิเตอร์; บารอมิเตอร์แบบดิจิตอล; บารอมิเตอร์ปรอท
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Ferramentas e sensores de medição > Barómetros: Barómetros de aneroides; Barómetros digitais; Barómetros de mercúrio
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Sensores e ferramentas para medição > Barômetros: Barômetros aneróides; Barômetros digitais; Barômetros de mercúrio
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 测量工具与传感器 > 气压表: 无液气压表; 数字气压表; 水银气压表
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 측정 도구/센서 > 기압계: 아네로이드 기압계; 디지털 기압계; 수은 기압계